Utah statutes.
71-8-4.   Veterans' Advisory Council -- Membership -- Duties and
responsibilities -- Per diem and expenses.
(1)  There is created a Veterans' Advisory Council whose purpose is to advise
the executive director of the Department of Veterans' Affairs on issues
relating to veterans.
(2)  The council shall consist of eleven voting members and one nonvoting
member, designated as follows:
(a)  five members appointed by the governor to serve four-year terms:
(i)  four veterans at large; and
(ii)  a representative from the Office of the Governor;
(b)  the director of the VA Health Care System or his designee;
(c)  the director of the VA Benefits Administration Regional Office in Salt
Lake City, or his designee;
(d)  a representative from the Veterans' Memorial Park Board for the duration
of his appointment to the board;
(e)  the commanders or their designees of the three largest veterans service
organizations in the state.  Their terms shall last as long as they hold the
required office; and
(f)  the executive director shall be a nonvoting member of the council.
(3) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (3)(b), as terms of current council
members expire, the governor shall appoint each new or reappointed member to a
four-year term commencing on July 1.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), the governor
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of council members are staggered so that
approximately half of the members appointed by the governor are appointed
every two years.
(4)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the governor
shall appoint a replacement for the unexpired term within 60 days of receiving
notice.
(5)  Members appointed by the governor may not serve more than two consecutive
terms.
(6) (a)  Any veterans' group or veteran may provide the executive director
with a list of recommendations for members on the council.
(b)  The executive director shall provide the governor with the list of
recommendations for members to be appointed to the council.
(c)  The governor shall make final appointments to the council by June 30 of
any year in which appointments are to be made under this chapter.
(7)  The council shall elect a chair from among its members every two years.
The chair shall be a veteran.
(8) (a)  The council shall meet at least once every quarter.
(b)  The executive director of the Department of Veterans' Affairs may convene
additional meetings, as necessary.
(9)  The department shall provide staff to the council.
(10)  Six voting members are a quorum for the transaction of business.
(11)  The council shall:
(a)  solicit input concerning veterans issues from veterans' groups throughout
the state;
(b)  report issues received to the executive director of the Department of
Veterans' Affairs and make recommendations concerning them;
(c)  keep abreast of federal developments that affect veterans locally and
advise the executive director of them; and
(d)  approve, by a majority vote, the use of monies generated from veterans'
license plates under Section 41-1a-422 for veterans' programs.
(12) (a)  Members shall receive no compensation or benefits for their
services, but may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of
the member’s official duties at the rates established by the Division of
Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(b)  Members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.
